Utah statutes.
72-1-208.5.   Definition -- Cooperation with metropolitan planning organizations -- Cooperation in plans and programs required.

(1)  As used in this section, "metropolitan planning organization" means an organization established under 23 U.S.C. Sec. 134.

(2)  The department shall cooperate with a metropolitan planning organization in the metropolitan planning organization's responsibility to carry out a continuing, cooperative, and comprehensive process for transportation planning and project programming.

(3)  If a metropolitan planning organization has a contiguous boundary with another metropolitan planning organization, the department shall cooperate with those organizations if the metropolitan planning organizations have:

(a)  coordinated project priorities, transportation plans, and transportation improvement programs; and

(b)  submitted joint priorities, plans, and programs to the department as comprehensive, integrated transportation plans.

(4)  Subject to the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 134, if the governor and the affected local units of government jointly determine that metropolitan planning organizations have failed to meet the guidelines under Subsection (3), the governor and local units of government may redesignate or realign the metropolitan planning organizations.

(5) (a)  A metropolitan planning organization is a governmental agency that is eligible to receive employment information from the Unemployment Insurance Division in accordance with Subsection 35A-4-312(5)(e) for the purpose of preparing transportation plans as required by 23 U.S.C. Sec. 134.

(b)  Information obtained under Subsection (5)(a) is limited to the employer's:

(i)  name;

(ii)  worksite address;

(iii)  industrial classification; and

(iv)  number of employees.

